Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,124
Rehabilitation services; board; powers; duties.

The State Board of Education, through the Division of Rehabilitation Services, shall (1) cooperate, pursuant to agreements with the federal government, in carrying out the purposes of any federal acts pertaining to vocational rehabilitation and may adopt such methods of administration as are found by the federal government to be necessary for the proper and efficient operation of such agreements or plans for vocational rehabilitation and to comply with such conditions as may be necessary to secure the full benefits of such federal acts and appropriations, (2) administer any legislation pursuant thereto enacted by the Legislature, (3) direct the disbursement of and administer the use of all funds provided by the federal government or this state for the vocational rehabilitation of disabled persons of this state, and (4) do all things necessary to insure the vocational rehabilitation of disabled persons.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 4, p. 1003;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1449;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 906.